North Carolina statutes. Chapter 23. Debtor and Creditor.
Article 7. Bankruptcy of Taxing, etc., Districts, Counties, Cities, Towns and Villages.

§ 23-48.
Local units authorized to avail themselves of provisions of bankruptcy law.

With the approval of the Local Government Commission of North Carolina and with the consent of the holders of such percentage or percentages of its indebtedness as may be required by Public Act Number three hundred two of the Seventy-fifth Congress, First Session, entitled “An Act to amend an Act entitled ‘An Act to establish a uniform system of bankruptcy throughout the United States’ approved July first, one thousand eight hundred ninety-eight and Acts amendatory thereof and supplementary thereto,” approved August sixteenth, one thousand nine hundred thirty-seven, as amended, any taxing district, local improvement district, school district, county, city, town or village in the State of North Carolina is authorized to avail itself of the provisions of said act of Congress as said act now exists or may be hereafter amended.

History.

1939, c. 203.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on this section, see 17 N.C.L. Rev. 343 (1939).